South Dakota, session 2026, HB1059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-35-70 be AMENDED:
32-35-70. An owner's policy of liability insurance referred to in § 32-35-68 shall
must insure the person named therein and any other person as insured, using any insured
vehicle or vehicles with the express or implied permission of the named insured, against
loss from the liability imposed by law for damages arising out of the ownership,
maintenance, or use of the vehicle or vehicles within the United States of America or the
Dominion of Canada, subject to limits exclusive of interests and costs, with respect to
each insured vehicle, as follows: twenty-five fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury
to or death of one person in any one accident and, subject to the limit for one person, fifty
one hundred thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons
in any one accident, and twenty-five fifty thousand dollars because of injury to or
destruction of property of others in any one accident.
If the policy complies with the filing and form requirements of Title title 58 and has
been approved by the Division of Insurance, the driver and owner has have complied with
this chapter.
The policy may exclude liability coverage if the policyholder certifies in writing that
the vehicle will not be operated during the policy period. The policy may exclude or limit
coverage pursuant to § 58-11-9.3, or for a relative residing in the named insured's
household.
Policies issued after January 1, 1987, and owners who have purchased such the
policies are in compliance with this chapter. Date of compliance does not affect any
pending litigation.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.